District of Columbia statutes.
29-1301.03

Applicability; construction.

(a)

This chapter shall be applicable to all benefit corporations.

(b)

This chapter shall not affect a statute or rule of law that is applicable to a business corporation that is not a benefit corporation, and shall not in and of itself create an implication that a contrary or different rule is applicable to a business corporation and not a benefit corporation.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, Chapters 1, 2, and 3 of this title shall apply to a benefit corporation organized under this chapter. A benefit corporation may simultaneously be subject to this chapter and one or more other chapters of this title.

(d)

A provision of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a benefit corporation may not relax, be inconsistent with, or supersede a provision of this chapter.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-305, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2735